apertium-de-nl.de.dix
    <pardef n="gef/allen__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alle</l>
          <r>allen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ällst</l>
          <r>allen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ällt</l>
          <r>allen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>allen</l>
          <r>allen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>allt</l>
          <r>allen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>allen</l>
          <r>allen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iel</l>
          <r>allen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ielst</l>
          <r>allen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iel</l>
          <r>allen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ielen</l>
          <r>allen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ielt</l>
          <r>allen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ielen</l>
          <r>allen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ha/ssen__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sse</l>
          <r>ssen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ßt</l>
          <r>ssen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ßt</l>
          <r>ssen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ssen</l>
          <r>ssen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ßt</l>
          <r>ssen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ssen</l>
          <r>ssen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ßte</l>
          <r>ssen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ßtest</l>
          <r>ssen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ßte</l>
          <r>ssen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ßten</l>
          <r>ssen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ßtet</l>
          <r>ssen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ßten</l>
          <r>ssen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="h/elfen__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elfe</l>
          <r>elfen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilfst</l>
          <r>elfen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilft</l>
          <r>elfen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elfen</l>
          <r>elfen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elft</l>
          <r>elfen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elfen</l>
          <r>elfen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alf</l>
          <r>elfen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alfst</l>
          <r>elfen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alf</l>
          <r>elfen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alfen</l>
          <r>elfen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alft</l>
          <r>elfen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alfen</l>
          <r>elfen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="w/erden__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erde</l>
          <r>erden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irst</l>
          <r>erden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ird</l>
          <r>erden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erden</l>
          <r>erden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erdet</l>
          <r>erden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erden</l>
          <r>erden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urde</l>
          <r>erden<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urdest</l>
          <r>erden<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urde</l>
          <r>erden<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urden</l>
          <r>erden<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urdet</l>
          <r>erden<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urden</l>
          <r>erden<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <!-- Abbreviations -->
    <pardef n="ca.__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="Abk."><i>Abk.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bes."><i>bes.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bzgl."><i>bzgl.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bzw."><i>bzw.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ca."><i>ca.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="DaF"><i>DaF</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="DDR"><i>DDR</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="d.h."><i>d.h.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="eigtl."><i>eigtl.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="entspr."><i>entspr.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="exkl."><i>exkl.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="f."><i>f.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="Fam."><i>Fam.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="geb."><i>geb.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="gegr."><i>gegr.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="Ges."><i>Ges.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="gest."><i>gest.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="Hrsg."><i>Hrsg.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="i.b."><i>i.b.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="i.J."><i>i.J.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="Kap."><i>Kap.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="m.E."><i>m.E.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="MfG"><i>MfG</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="m.W."><i>m.W.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="Nr."><i>Nr.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="od."><i>od.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="S."><i>S.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="s.u."><i>s.u.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="u."><i>u.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="u.a."><i>u.a.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="usw."><i>usw.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="v.Chr."><i>v.Chr.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="z.B."><i>z.B.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="z.T."><i>z.T.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="z.Z."><i>z.Z.</i><par n="ca.__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="gefallen"><i>gef</i><par n="gef/allen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hassen"><i>ha</i><par n="ha/ssen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="helfen"><i>h</i><par n="h/elfen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="werden"><i>w</i><par n="w/erden__vblex"/></e>
